src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON D/arm__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Deka__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Denkm/al__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Diebst/ahl__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Ding__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCer/DATern/GENer/NOMer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Ding__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCer/DATern/GENer/NOMer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON D/orf__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Dr/aht__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Dritten__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON D/uft__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON D/unst__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Ecu__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Eichh/orn__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Ei__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCer/DATern/GENer/NOMer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: 0er-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Einst/urz__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Embryo__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCnen/DATnen/GENnen/NOMnen ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: 0nen-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Etwas__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCse/DATsen/GENse/NOMse ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENses/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATse ;

LEXICON F/aden__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQ/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON F/ass__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON F/aß__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON F/aust__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Flederm/aus__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Fl/oh__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Fl/oß__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Flugh/afen__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQ/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Forint__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Fr/ack__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Fratz__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Fremde__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCrn/DATrn/GENrn/NOMrn ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACCrn/DATrn/GENrn/NOMr ;

LEXICON Fr/osch__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Fr/ucht__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Fußb/all__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON F/uß__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON G/ang__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON G/ans__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: Qe-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON G/arten__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQ/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Garteng/ott__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON G/ast__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Gatt__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON G/aul__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Gebärm/utter__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Gebi/ß__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Geh/alt__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Geist__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCer/DATern/GENer/NOMer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Generalst/ab__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Gen__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Geschm/ack__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Gest/ank__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Geweih__n_nt
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Gewissen__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Gezeite__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: 0n-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Giftz/ahn__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Gl/as__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Gr/aben__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQ/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Gr/ab__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Großv/ater__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON G/ut__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON H/ahn__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON H/als__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON H/ammer__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON H/andel__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON H/and__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Hass__n_m 
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DATse/DAT/GENses/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON H/aupt__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Hauptst/adt__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;
