src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns 
Hohlwand:Hohlwand H/and__n_f ;
Leinwand:Leinwand H/and__n_f ;
Gezeite:Gezeite Gezeite__n_f ;
Gebärmutter:Gebärmutter Gebärm/utter__n_f ;
Urgroßmutter:Urgroßmutter Gebärm/utter__n_f ;
Gans:Gans G/ans__n_f ;
Waldmaus:Waldmaus Flederm/aus__n_f ;
Fledermaus:Fledermaus Flederm/aus__n_f ;
Waldspitzmaus:Waldspitzmaus Flederm/aus__n_f ;
Kleinstadt:Kleinstadt Hauptst/adt__n_f ;
Marktstadt:Marktstadt Hauptst/adt__n_f ;
Frucht:Frucht Fr/ucht__n_f ;
Sehnsucht:Sehnsucht Fr/ucht__n_f ;
Faust:Faust F/aust__n_f ;
Generalstab:Generalstab Generalst/ab__n_m ;
Äskulapstab:Äskulapstab Generalst/ab__n_m ;
Fremde:Fremde Fremde__n_m ;
Durchgang:Durchgang G/ang__n_m ;
Ausgang:Ausgang G/ang__n_m ;
Dreiklang:Dreiklang G/ang__n_m ;
Ding:Ding Ding__n_m ;
Schokoladepudding:Schokoladepudding Ding__n_m ;
Frosch:Frosch Fr/osch__n_m ;
Laubfrosch:Laubfrosch Fr/osch__n_m ;
Floh:Floh Fl/oh__n_m ;
Geschmack:Geschmack Geschm/ack__n_m ;
Beigeschmack:Beigeschmack Geschm/ack__n_m ;
Frack:Frack Fr/ack__n_m ;
Schlafsack:Schlafsack Fr/ack__n_m ;
Fettsack:Fettsack Fr/ack__n_m ;
Kleiderschrank:Kleiderschrank Gest/ank__n_m ;
Schwank:Schwank Gest/ank__n_m ;
Geweih:Geweih Geweih__n_nt ;
Handel:Handel H/andel__n_m ;
Pfahl:Pfahl Diebst/ahl__n_m ;
Diebstahl:Diebstahl Diebst/ahl__n_m ;
Ladendiebstahl:Ladendiebstahl Diebst/ahl__n_m ;
Tennisball:Tennisball Fußb/all__n_m ;
Einzelfall:Einzelfall Fußb/all__n_m ;
Wasserfall:Wasserfall Fußb/all__n_m ;
Gaul:Gaul G/aul__n_m ;
Darm:Darm D/arm__n_m ;
Schwarm:Schwarm D/arm__n_m ;
Graben:Graben Gr/aben__n_m ;
Straßengraben:Straßengraben Gr/aben__n_m ;
Teeladen:Teeladen F/aden__n_m ;
Buchladen:Buchladen F/aden__n_m ;
Zeitungsladen:Zeitungsladen F/aden__n_m ;
Seehafen:Seehafen Flugh/afen__n_m ;
Flughafen:Flughafen Flugh/afen__n_m ;
Haupthafen:Haupthafen Flugh/afen__n_m ;
Baumgarten:Baumgarten G/arten__n_m ;
Steingarten:Steingarten G/arten__n_m ;
Vorgarten:Vorgarten G/arten__n_m ;
Exporten:Exporten Dritten__n_m ;
Dritten:Dritten Dritten__n_m ;
Überrest:Überrest Dritten__n_m ;
Zahn:Zahn H/ahn__n_m ;
Truthahn:Truthahn H/ahn__n_m ;
Rabbi:Rabbi Embryo__n_m ;
Embryo:Embryo Embryo__n_m ;
Hammer:Hammer H/ammer__n_m ;
Ziehvater:Ziehvater Großv/ater__n_m ;
Schwiegervater:Schwiegervater Großv/ater__n_m ;
Hals:Hals H/als__n_m ;
Geizhals:Geizhals H/als__n_m ;
Hass:Hass Hass__n_m ;
Duft:Duft D/uft__n_m ;
Blumenduft:Blumenduft D/uft__n_m ;
Draht:Draht Dr/aht__n_m ;
Gehalt:Gehalt Geh/alt__n_m ;
Sari:Sari Forint__n_m ;
Forint:Forint Forint__n_m ;
Stammgast:Stammgast G/ast__n_m ;
Präsidentenpalast:Präsidentenpalast G/ast__n_m ;
Wiking:Wiking Geist__n_m ;
Geist:Geist Geist__n_m ;
Dunst:Dunst D/unst__n_m ;
Abgott:Abgott Garteng/ott__n_m ;
Gartengott:Gartengott Garteng/ott__n_m ;
Samurai:Samurai Ecu__n_m ;
Ecu:Ecu Ecu__n_m ;
Zulu:Zulu Ecu__n_m ;
Absturz:Absturz Einst/urz__n_m ;
Flugzeugabsturz:Flugzeugabsturz Einst/urz__n_m ;
Einsturz:Einsturz Einst/urz__n_m ;
Kopfschmerz:Kopfschmerz Fratz__n_m ;
Weltschmerz:Weltschmerz Fratz__n_m ;
Fratz:Fratz Fratz__n_m ;
Fuß:Fuß F/uß__n_m ;
Quadratfuß:Quadratfuß F/uß__n_m ;
Gruß:Gruß F/uß__n_m ;
Deka:Deka Deka__n_nt ;
Service:Service Deka__n_nt ;
Zimmerservice:Zimmerservice Deka__n_nt ;
Grab:Grab Gr/ab__n_nt ;
Dorf:Dorf D/orf__n_nt ;
Pfahldorf:Pfahldorf D/orf__n_nt ;
Ding:Ding Ding__n_nt ;
Scheit:Scheit Ding__n_nt ;
Ei:Ei Ei__n_nt ;
Spiegelei:Spiegelei Ei__n_nt ;
Vogelei:Vogelei Ei__n_nt ;
Osterei:Osterei Ei__n_nt ;
Tal:Tal Denkm/al__n_nt ;
Denkmal:Denkmal Denkm/al__n_nt ;
Spital:Spital Denkm/al__n_nt ;
Heck:Heck Gen__n_nt ;
Picknick:Picknick Gen__n_nt ;
Verbrechen:Verbrechen Gewissen__n_nt ;
Gewissen:Gewissen Gewissen__n_nt ;
Giftzahn:Giftzahn Giftz/ahn__n_nt ;
Jagdhorn:Jagdhorn Eichh/orn__n_nt ;
Einhorn:Einhorn Eichh/orn__n_nt ;
Hagelkorn:Hagelkorn Eichh/orn__n_nt ;
Bierglas:Bierglas Gl/as__n_nt ;
Buntglas:Buntglas Gl/as__n_nt ;
Etwas:Etwas Etwas__n_nt ;
Fass:Fass F/ass__n_nt ;
Tintenfass:Tintenfass F/ass__n_nt ;
Oberhaupt:Oberhaupt H/aupt__n_nt ;
Staatsoberhaupt:Staatsoberhaupt H/aupt__n_nt ;
Gatt:Gatt Gatt__n_nt ;
Gut:Gut G/ut__n_nt ;
Gebiß:Gebiß Gebi/ß__n_nt ;
Geschoß:Geschoß Gebi/ß__n_nt ;
Faß:Faß F/aß__n_nt ;
Floß:Floß Fl/oß__n_nt ;
